Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-615
Revoked or suspended permit; unlawful acts; violation; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to take any species of wildlife protected by the Game Law while his or her permits are revoked or suspended. It shall be unlawful for any person to apply for or purchase a permit to hunt, fish, or harvest fur in Nebraska while his or her permits are revoked and while the privilege to purchase such permits is suspended. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor and in addition shall be suspended from hunting, fishing, and fur harvesting or purchasing permits to hunt, fish, and harvest fur for a period of not less than two years as the court directs. The court shall consider the number and severity of the violations of the Game Law in determining the length of the suspension.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 305;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 28;

Laws 2017, LB566, § 5.